California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) No later than January 1, 2029, a person that, as part of the installation of a covered product, removes a covered product from a residence or business shall transport, or contract to transport, all of the removed covered products to an approved collection site. Covered material collected at an approved collection site shall be transported to a recycling facility designated by the producer responsibility organization.

(b) An approved collection site shall ensure that covered products are collected in the prescribed conditions required by the approved producer responsibility plan. The conditions shall include, but are not limited to, the following requirements:

(1) A
 covered product shall be kept in a location that allows it to remain dry at all times.

(2) A container holding a collected covered product shall be free of all contaminated discarded waste items.

(3) An approved collection site shall permit a processor’s prescribed container to be housed on site for loading and for pickup at the approved collection site, if the processor is approved by the producer responsibility plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financial Provisions [42968.50. - 42968.52.]

42968.50.

(a) No later than 90 days before a producer responsibility plan is submitted to the department, the department shall notify the producer responsibility organization of its estimated regulatory costs, including its full personnel costs, related to implementing and enforcing this chapter. This shall include the actual and reasonable costs associated with regulation development pursuant to Section 42968.1 and other startup activities prior to producer responsibility plan submittal and approval.

(b) (1) The producer responsibility organization shall, on a schedule determined by the department, pay the department fees for its incurred costs as described in subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall deposit all fees received from the producer responsibility organization pursuant to this section into the Carpet Responsibility Fund.

(c) (1) The Carpet Stewardship Account, previously established in the Integrated Waste Management Fund, shall be known as the Carpet Responsibility Fund. The Carpet Stewardship Penalty Subaccount shall be known as the Carpet Responsibility Penalty Account.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Carpet Responsibility Fund shall be expended by the department to implement and enforce this chapter, as well as to reimburse any outstanding loans made from other funds used to finance regulation development and startup costs of the department’s activities pursuant to this chapter. The money in the Carpet Responsibility Fund shall not
 be expended for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.51.

(a) The producer responsibility organization shall pay the department a quarterly administrative fee. The department shall set the fee at an amount that, when paid is adequate to cover the department’s full costs of administering and enforcing this chapter, including any program development costs or regulatory costs incurred by the department prior to a producer responsibility plan being submitted. The department may establish a variable fee based on relevant factors.

(b) The total amount of fees collected annually pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs incurred by the department in connection with the administration and enforcement of the requirements of this chapter.

(c) The department shall identify the direct development or regulatory costs it incurs pursuant to this chapter prior to the submittal of a producer responsibility plan and shall establish a fee in an amount adequate to cover those costs, which shall be paid by the producer responsibility organization.

(d) The department shall deposit the fees collected pursuant to this section into the Carpet Responsibility Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.52.

(a) In recognition that the material makeup and construction of a covered product affects the technical and economic recyclability of a covered product, the funding mechanism required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42968.32 shall establish and be composed of a system of differential assessments that takes into account the financial burden that a particular covered product has on the producer responsibility plan, and the amount of postconsumer recycled content contained in a particular covered product. Based on market history and modeling, if a certain covered product requires a higher subsidy to incentivize use in the marketplace, then that material shall have a proportionally higher assessment assigned to it. The assessment shall be remitted to the producer responsibility organization on a
 quarterly basis and the producer responsibility organization may expend the assessment only to carry out the producer responsibility plan.

(b) The amount of the assessment and the anticipated revenues from the assessment shall be specified in the producer responsibility plan and shall be approved by the department as part of the producer responsibility plan. The amount of the assessment shall be sufficient to meet, but not exceed, the anticipated cost of carrying out the producer responsibility plan. The amount of the assessment shall not create an unfair advantage in the marketplace.

(c) The assessment established pursuant to this section is exempt from the taxes imposed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) The
 assessment shall be added by a producer to the purchase price of all covered products sold by producers to a California retailer or wholesaler or otherwise sold for use in the state. The assessment shall be clearly visible on invoices or functionally equivalent billing documents as a separate line item and shall be accompanied by a brief description of the assessment or a label approved by the department.

(2) Each retailer and wholesaler shall add the assessment to the purchase price of all covered products sold in the state. The assessment shall be clearly visible on invoices or functionally equivalent billing documents as a separate line item and shall be accompanied by a brief description of the assessment or a label approved by the department.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of the assessment be reduced by the producer responsibility organization as the
 producer responsibility program is implemented over time and becomes more efficient.

(e) (1) If the amount of the assessment is insufficient to fund the producer responsibility program, the producer responsibility organization shall submit a revision to the producer responsibility plan, pursuant to Section 42968.35, to increase the assessment.

(2) If the assessment generates a fund balance at the end of a program year that is greater than one year’s operating costs of the producer responsibility plan, the producer responsibility organization shall submit a revision to the producer responsibility plan, pursuant to Section 42968.35, to decrease the assessment.

(f) The producer responsibility organization shall not expend funds from the assessment for any of the following purposes:

(1) Penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Costs associated with litigation against the state.

(3) Engineered municipal solid waste conversion, as defined in Section 40131.2, the use of cement kilns to burn covered product, or transformation, as defined in Section 40201.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Records, Audits, and Reports [42968.60. - 42968.63.]

42968.60.

(a) The producer responsibility organization shall keep board minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the activities and transactions of the producer responsibility organization.

(b) The producer responsibility organization shall include in its producer responsibility plan a process by which the financial activities of the organization or individual producers that are related to implementation of the producer responsibility plan will be subject to an independent audit consistent with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP), which shall be reviewed by the department.

(c) The department may audit the producer responsibility organization or an individual
 producer annually.

(d) It is a violation of this chapter for the producer responsibility organization, producer, or their respective agent who holds records to fail to produce, as part of a department audit or review of a third-party audit, documents or data that is requested by the department or documents or data that is required to be collected or generated to carry out operation of the producer responsibility plan in the form and manner determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.61.

(a) The producer responsibility organization shall retain an independent public accountant, certified in the United States, to annually audit the accounting books of the producer responsibility organization. The department shall review the independent certified public accountant audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the producer responsibility organization’s producer responsibility plan and annual report, submitted pursuant to this chapter. After the department conducts its own review of the audit, the department shall notify the producer responsibility organization of any conduct or practice that does not comply with this chapter and of any inconsistencies identified in the review of the audit. The producer responsibility organization may obtain copies of the department’s review
 of the audit, including proprietary information contained in the department’s review of the audit, upon request. The department shall withhold from disclosure confidential proprietary information to the extent allowed under Section 1040 of the Evidence Code and the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The items submitted to the department as part of the review of the audit shall include all of the following:

(1) Financial statements audited in accordance with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP).

(2) An audit of the producer responsibility organization’s compliance with this chapter.

(3) An audit of the producer responsibility organization’s adherence to, execution of, and consistency with its producer responsibility plan.

(b) No later than 18 months after the department approves the producer responsibility organization’s producer responsibility plan, the producer responsibility organization shall include the independent audit in the annual report submitted to the department pursuant to Section 42968.62. The department shall review the audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the producer responsibility organization’s producer responsibility plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.62.

On or before July 1 of each year, the producer responsibility organization shall submit in the form and manner determined by the department an annual report and make the report publicly available on the producer responsibility organization’s internet website. The report shall include all of the following information for the preceding calendar year:

(a) The producer responsibility organization’s revenues and costs, with the costs according to the cost categories established in the producer responsibility plan.

(b) A summary of any anticipated changes to allocations in cost categories for the following calendar year.

(c) Any changes to the distribution of
 participating producers’ costs pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42968.23.

(d) The square footage, yardage, weight, or other metric, as determined by the department, of covered products, by carpet type, for each of the following:

(1) Covered product that was collected.

(2) Covered product that was processed.

(3) Covered product that was recycled.

(4) Covered product that was disposed.

(e) A list of the producer responsibility organization’s collection sites, by name, location, and type.

(f) An updated list of the names and contact information, including
 email address, phone number, and physical and mailing addresses of producers.

(g) A description of methods used to collect, transport, recycle, and divert covered products by the producer responsibility organization including a description of all of the following:

(1) How the producer responsibility organization handled and managed covered products according to the priority of waste management practices provided in Section 40051.

(2) How the producer responsibility organization maximized recycling of all covered products.

(3) How the producer responsibility organization minimized disposal of all covered products collected by the producer responsibility organization.

(4) Results of the
 producer responsibility organization’s assessment of the efficacy of the collection, sorting, and transportation processes pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (h) of Section 42968.32.

(h) A description of how the producer responsibility organization improved the collection, processing, and recycling operations for covered products, including, but not limited to, pilot programs to test new processes, methods, or equipment.

(i) A description of outreach efforts and education, including, but not limited to, education and outreach provided by the producer responsibility organization for the purpose of promoting the collection, reuse, and recycling of covered products. This includes messaging on environmentally preferable purchasing.

(j) Findings from the evaluation of the comprehensive statewide education and
 outreach program required by subdivision (i) of Section 42968.32.

(k) A report on activities the producer responsibility organization has undertaken to prioritize the use of sorting and recycling facilities located closer to the point of generation to minimize transportation emissions and increase accountability for the ultimate disposition of collected covered products.

(l) Any other information deemed relevant by the producer responsibility organization for the department to determine compliance with the approved producer responsibility plan.

(m) Any other information required by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42968.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 170.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.63.

(a) No later than 120 days after the date the department receives the annual report submitted by the producer responsibility organization pursuant to Section 42968.62, the department shall notify the producer responsibility organization if the annual report is compliant or noncompliant.

(b) If the department determines that the annual report is noncompliant due to failure to meet the requirements of this chapter, then the department may require the resubmittal of the annual report or take enforcement action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Enforcement [42968.70. - 42968.74.]

42968.70.

(a) Within 24 months of the effective date of regulations pursuant to Section 42968.1, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall post on its internet website a list of producers that are in compliance with this chapter. The department shall list, as appropriate, the reported brands of covered products for each producer.

(b) A producer that is not listed on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a) that demonstrates compliance with this chapter before the next list is posted by the department may either be added to the internet website or be provided a certification letter from the department stating that the producer of a covered product is in compliance with this chapter.

(c) (1) A retailer, importer, distributor, or wholesaler of a covered product shall monitor the department’s internet website to determine if a producer, brand, or covered product is in compliance with this chapter for that brand of covered product.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d), on and after the date a producer responsibility plan is approved by the department pursuant to Section 42968.30, a retailer, importer, distributor, or wholesaler shall not sell, distribute, offer for sale, or import a covered product in or into the state for sale in the state unless the producer of the covered product is listed as in compliance pursuant to this section for that brand and covered product.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer, importer, or distributor may sell, offer
 for sale, import, or distribute a covered product if, on the date the retailer or distributor sells or offers for sale the covered product in or into the state, the producer, brand, or covered product was listed as compliant on the department’s internet website.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a retailer or distributor may, for any inventory in stock before the initial list was posted by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), sell or distribute that inventory for sale in or into the state.

(f) If the department determines a producer is not in compliance with this chapter, the department shall remove the producer from the list of compliant producers posted on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a).

(g) The department shall list on its internet website a producer, along
 with its brands and covered products, if the department subsequently determines that the producer is in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.71.

(a) An administrative penalty up to the following amounts may be administratively imposed by the department on the producer responsibility organization or a producer who is in violation of any provision of this chapter:

(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day.

(2) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day if the violation is intentional or knowing.

(b) In assessing or reviewing the amount of an administrative penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a violation of this chapter, the department or the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The nature
 and extent of the violation.

(2) The number and severity of the violation or violations.

(3) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.

(4) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this chapter and the period of time over which these measures were taken.

(5) The willfulness of the violator’s misconduct.

(6) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community.

(7) Any other factor that justice may require.

(c) Upon a written finding that a producer responsibility
 organization, producer, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or any other party regulated has not met a material requirement of this chapter, in addition to any other penalties authorized under this chapter, the department may take one or both of the following actions to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter, after affording the producer responsibility organization, producer, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or any other party regulated a reasonable opportunity to respond to, or rebut, the finding:

(1) Revoke the producer responsibility organization’s producer responsibility plan approval or require the producer responsibility organization to resubmit the producer responsibility plan.

(2) Require additional reporting relating to compliance with the material requirement of this chapter that was not met.

(d) The department shall establish, through regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42968.1, a process that shall include an informal hearing process by which the penalties will be assessed.

(e) The department shall deposit all penalties collected pursuant to this section into the Carpet Responsibility Penalty Account. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Carpet Responsibility Penalty Account shall be available for expenditure by the department on activities related to the collection and recycling of covered products, grants for related purposes, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(f) The Administrative Adjudication Bill of Rights, as set forth in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, applies to hearings conducted under this chapter and mandates minimum due
 process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 171.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.72.

(a) If the producer responsibility organization violates this chapter three or more times, the department may determine the producer responsibility organization permanently ineligible to act as the producer responsibility organization on behalf of producers to design, submit, and administer a producer responsibility plan pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If the producer responsibility organization becomes ineligible pursuant to subdivision (a), then the department may revoke approval of the producer responsibility organization pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42968.71.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.73.

(a) A producer responsibility organization, producer, retailer, importer, distributor, and wholesaler shall do both of the following:

(1) Upon request, provide the department access to its facilities and operations to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2) Upon request, provide the department relevant records necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(b) The records required by this chapter shall be maintained and accessible for five years. All reports and records provided to the department pursuant to this chapter shall be provided under penalty of perjury.

(c) The department may impose administrative penalties pursuant to Section 42968.71 on a producer, producer responsibility organization, distributor, retailer, importer, or wholesaler that fails to provide the department with the access required pursuant to this section.

(d) The department may post a notice on the department’s internet website that is maintained pursuant to Section 42968.70 that a producer has failed to provide the department with access pursuant to this section and is no longer in compliance with this chapter, along with the producer’s brands and covered products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.74.

After the time for judicial review under Section 11523 of the Government Code has expired, the department may apply to the small claims court or superior court, depending on the jurisdictional amount and any other remedy sought, in the county where the penalties, restitution, or other remedy was imposed by the department, for a judgment to collect any unpaid penalties or restitution or to enforce any other remedy provided by this chapter. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final agency order or decision, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered shall have the same force and effect as, and shall be subject to, all the provisions of law relating to a judgment in a civil action
 and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court. The court shall make enforcement of the judgment a priority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 172.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Antitrust Immunity [42968.80. - 42968.80.]

42968.80.

(a) An action specified in subdivision (b) that is taken by a producer or producer responsibility organization that relates to any of the following is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to all of the following actions taken by the producer responsibility organization:

(1) The
 creation, implementation, or management of a producer responsibility plan approved by the department and the determination of the types or quantities of covered products recycled, collected, or otherwise managed pursuant to a producer responsibility plan.

(2) The determination of the cost and structure of an approved producer responsibility plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, collection, or disbursement of a charge associated with funding the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. Product Stewardship for Carpets [42970. - 42983.5.]

42970.

The purpose of this chapter is to increase the amount of postconsumer carpet that is diverted from landfills and recycled into secondary products or otherwise managed in a manner that is consistent with the state’s hierarchy for waste management practices pursuant to Section 40051.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 2398)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42971.

For purposes of this chapter, and unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Brand” means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies the carpet, rather than its components, and attributes the carpet to the owner or licensee of the brand as the manufacturer.

(b) “CARE” means the Carpet America Recovery Effort, a third-party nonprofit carpet stewardship organization incorporated as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code in 2002 and established to increase the reclamation and stewardship of postconsumer carpet.

(c) “CARE MOU” means the 2012
 Memorandum of Understanding for Carpet Stewardship, as to be negotiated among the carpet industry, states, and nongovernmental organization stakeholders as a successor to the 2002 memorandum of understanding.

(d) (1) “Carpet” means a manufactured article that is used in commercial or residential buildings affixed or placed on the floor or building walking surface as a decorative or functional building interior feature and that is primarily constructed of a top visible surface of synthetic or natural face fibers or yarns or tufts attached to a backing system derived from synthetic or natural materials.

(2) “Carpet” includes, but is not limited to, a commercial or a residential broadloom carpet or modular carpet tiles.

(3) “Carpet” does not include a rug, pad, cushion, or underlayment used in
 conjunction with, or separately from, a carpet.

(e) “Carpet stewardship organization” or “organization” means either of the following:

(1) An organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) that is appointed by one or more manufacturers to act as an agent on behalf of the manufacturer to design, submit, and administer a carpet stewardship plan pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A carpet manufacturer that complies with this chapter as an individual manufacturer.

(f) “Carpet stewardship plan” or “plan” means a plan written by an individual manufacturer or a carpet stewardship organization, on behalf of one or more manufacturers, that includes all of the information required by Section
 42972.

(g) “Consumer” means a purchaser, owner, or lessee of carpet, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(i) “Label” means a graphic representation of three chasing arrows with a carpet roll inside the arrows, or an alternative design, designed by CARE, after consultation with retailers and wholesalers, and approved by the department for use on all invoices or functionally equivalent billing documents pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 42972.

(j) “Manufacturer” means, with regard to a carpet that is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state, any of the following:

(1) The person who manufactures the carpet and who sells, offers for sale, or distributes that carpet in the state under that person’s own name or brand.

(2) If there is no person who sells, offers for sale, or distributes the carpet in the state under the person’s own name or brand, the manufacturer of the carpet is the owner or licensee of a trademark or brand under which the carpet is sold or distributed in the state, whether or not the trademark is registered.

(3) If there is no person who is a manufacturer of the carpet for the purpose of paragraphs (1) and (2), the manufacturer of that carpet is the person who imports the carpet into the state for sale or distribution.

(k) “Postconsumer carpet” means carpet that is no longer used for its manufactured
 purpose.

(l) “Processor” means a company that uses a process, including, but not limited to, shredding, grinding, sheering, or depolymerization, to convert discarded whole carpet into finished recycled output that is ready to be utilized as an input material for manufacturing products.

(m) “Recycling” means the process, consistent with Section 40180, of converting postconsumer carpet into a useful product that meets the quality standards necessary to be used in the marketplace.

(n) “Retailer” means a person who offers new carpet in a retail sale, as defined in Section 6007 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, including a retail sale through any means, including remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or an internet website or other similar electronic means.

(o) “Sell” or “sales” means a transfer of title of a carpet for consideration, including a remote sale conducted through a sales outlet, catalog, or internet website or similar electronic means. For purposes of this chapter, “sell” or “sales” includes a lease through which a carpet is provided to a consumer by a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer.

(p) “Wholesaler” means a person who offers new carpet for sale in this state in a sale that is not a retail sale, as defined in Section 6007 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and in which the carpet is intended to be resold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 242.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42972.

(a) On or before September 30, 2011, a manufacturer of carpets sold in this state shall, individually or through a carpet stewardship organization, submit a carpet stewardship plan to the department that will do all of the following:

(1) Achieve the purposes of this chapter, as described in Section 42970, and meet the requirements of Section 42975.

(2) Achieve a 24-percent recycling rate for postconsumer carpet by January 1, 2020, and any other recycling rate established by the department pursuant to Section 42972.2. The carpet stewardship plan shall include quantifiable five-year goals and annual goals for how the recycling rate will be achieved and how the carpet stewardship organization or
 manufacturer plans to do the following:

(A) Increase the weight of postconsumer carpet that is recycled and reduce the disposal of postconsumer carpet.

(B) Increase the collection convenience for the recycling of postconsumer carpet and increase the collection of postconsumer carpet for recycling.

(C) Expand and incentivize markets for products made from postconsumer carpet.

(D) Increase processor capacity, including processor capacity in California.

(E) Increase the recyclability of carpet.

(3) Describe proposed measures that will enable the management of postconsumer carpet in a manner consistent with the state’s solid
 waste management hierarchy, including, but not limited to, source reduction, source separation and processing to segregate and recover recyclable materials, and environmentally safe management of materials that cannot feasibly be recycled.

(4) (A) Include a funding mechanism, consistent with subdivision (c), that provides sufficient funding to carry out the plan, including the administrative, operational, and capital costs of the plan, the requirements of Section 42972.7, payment of fees pursuant to Section 42977, and incentive payments that will advance the purposes of this chapter, including incentives or grants to state-approved apprenticeship programs for training apprentice and journey-level carpet installers in proper carpet recycling practices. Any grants or subsidies provided for the recycling of postconsumer carpet shall be structured to incentivize the recycling of carpet materials that have the highest
 recyclability. The funding mechanism shall account for the need to provide the industry, including carpet installation contractors, with fair notice of changes to the amount of the carpet stewardship assessment established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(B) Consistent with subparagraph (A), commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the program shall allocate 8 percent of assessments collected pursuant to subdivision (c), as determined by the department, for grants to apprenticeship programs, subject to the requirements and conditions of this section. Any portion of the 8 percent that is not awarded and used in a fiscal year shall be credited to the amount to be allocated or awarded in the following fiscal year pursuant to this section, thereby reducing the amount allocated or awarded in the following fiscal year by the amount of the credit.

(C) An apprenticeship program shall apply to the producer responsibility organization for a grant. The apprenticeship program shall submit a report to the producer responsibility organization and the department outlining its expenditure of the grant funds for purposes of this program prior to receipt of new grants.

(5) Include education and outreach efforts to consumers, commercial building owners, carpet installation contractors, and retailers to promote their participation in achieving the purposes of the carpet stewardship plan as described in paragraph (1). These education and outreach materials may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible to the consumer.

(B) Written materials and templates of materials for reproduction by
 retailers to be provided to carpet installation contractors and consumers at the time of purchase or delivery or both.

(C) Promotional materials or activities, or both, that explain the purpose of carpet stewardship and the means by which it is being carried out.

(6) Include a process by which the financial activities of the organization or individual manufacturer that are related to implementation of the plan will be subject to an independent audit consistent with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP), which shall be reviewed by the department.

(7) (A) Include a contingency plan should the plan expire without approval of a new plan or should the plan be revoked. The contingency plan shall demonstrate how the activities in the plan will continue to be carried out in the absence of a
 plan by the department through some other entity, such as an escrow company, consistent with Section 42972.7.

(B) The contingency plan shall guarantee that the contracts, financial data, and other necessary authority and assets to operate the program shall vest in a trustee approved by the department. The trustee shall operate the most recently approved carpet stewardship plan, subject to the direction of the department, until that time as a new carpet stewardship plan is approved. Upon the carpet stewardship plan expiration or revocation of the carpet stewardship plan, the balance of the carpet stewardship organization’s operating reserves collected pursuant to this chapter shall be transferred to the control of the trustee within five calendar days, along with all documents, digital records, contracts, and files related to the operation of the carpet stewardship plan.

(8) A
 mechanism for submitting a successor carpet stewardship plan to the department no less than 12 months before the expiration of the submitted carpet stewardship plan. If a carpet stewardship organization fails to submit a successor carpet stewardship plan at least 12 months before the expiration of the carpet stewardship plan, then the carpet stewardship organization shall, upon the expiration of the submitted carpet stewardship plan, cease being the stewardship organization, for purposes of this chapter.

(b) The plan prepared pursuant to this section shall be designed to accept and manage all suitable postconsumer carpet, regardless of polymer type or primary materials of construction.

(c) (1) In recognition that the material makeup and construction of postconsumer carpet affects the technical and economic recyclability of carpet, the funding mechanism
 required pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) shall establish and be composed of a system of differential assessments that takes into account the financial burden that a particular carpet material has on the stewardship program, and the amount of postconsumer recycled content contained in a particular carpet. Based on market history and modeling, if a certain carpet material requires a higher subsidy to incentivize use in the marketplace, then that material shall have a proportionally higher assessment assigned to it. The assessment shall be remitted to the carpet stewardship organization on a quarterly basis and the carpet stewardship organization may expend the assessment only to carry out the plan.

(2) The amount of the assessment and the anticipated revenues from the assessment shall be specified in the plan and shall be approved by the department as part of the plan. The amount of the assessment shall be sufficient to meet, but not
 exceed, the anticipated cost of carrying out the plan. The amount of the assessment shall not create an unfair advantage in the marketplace.

(3) The assessment established pursuant to this subdivision is exempt from the taxes imposed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and shall meet both of the following requirements:
